District of Columbia statutes.
38-1402

Registration of medical and dental colleges — Application.

It shall be the duty of the proper officers of any such college, before commencing or continuing business, to apply to the said Mayor for registration and a permit to commence or continue business; and the Council of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and required to make such regulations concerning the form of such application, the evidence to be adduced in support thereof, and the method of taking such evidence as it may deem best, and shall have power, and it shall be its duty, to give public notice of all hearings upon such applications; and no registration and permit shall be granted until after the Council shall have, by the inquiry and hearing hereinbefore provided for and such other inquiry as it may see fit to make, satisfied itself that all such medical or dental colleges are fully equipped, both by the character and fitness of the faculty and the sufficiency of their appliances, to give suitable and sufficient instruction in the theory and practice of medicine or dental surgery.

May 4, 1896, 29 Stat. 113, ch. 154, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1702.
1973 Ed., § 31-902.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(241) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government